Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1611
Permit or order; contents.

The commission may include in a permit or order all things necessary to carry out the objectives of the Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act and to protect and adjust the respective rights and obligations of persons affected by geologic storage.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 11.